West Virginia, session 2025, HB3128.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 29. LAW-ENFORCEMENT TRAINING AND CERTIFICATION. §30-29-13. Chief executive requirements. Notwithstanding any provision of this code to the contrary, on or after July 1, 2018, any person elected or appointed to serve as the chief executive of a municipal law-enforcement agency shall be a certified, or certifiable as, a law-enforcement officer as provided in §30-29-5 of this code: Provided, That chief executives of municipal law-enforcement agencies employed prior to July 1, 2018, who are not certified law-enforcement officers are exempt from this requirement for purposes of the position he or she holds as of that date.